scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cw.yaml
     abaabas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indabaabaswaa
     abaabas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabaabaswaa
     abaabas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidabaabaswaa
     abaabas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: indabaabasog
     abaabas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabaabaswaan
     abaabas+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abaabaswaad
     abaabas+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebaabaswaad
     abaabas+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abaabas
     abaabas+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abaabaswi
     abaabikizwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabaabikizwaa
     abaabikizwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabaakizwaan
     abaabikizwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abaakizwaad
     abaabikizwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebaakizwaad
     abaabikizwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abaakizwi
     abiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indabizwaa
     abiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabizwaa
     abiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidabizwaa
     abiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabizwaan
     abiz+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abizwaad
     abiz+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebizwaad
     abiz+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abiz
     abiz+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abizwi
     abizidezwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabizidezwaa
     abizidezwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abizidezwaad
     abizidezwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebizidezwaad
     abizidezwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abizidez
     abizidezwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abizidezwi
     abiigizwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indabiigizwaa
     abiigizwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabiigizwaan
     abiigizwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abiigizwaad
     abiigizwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebiigizwaad
     abiigizwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abiigizwi
     abwewas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indabwewaswaa
     abwewas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabwewaswaa
     abwewas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidabwewaswaa
     abwewas+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abwewaswaad
     abwewas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabwewaswaan
     abwewas+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebwewaswaad
     abwewas+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abwewas
     adima'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indadima'waa
     adima'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadima'waa
     adima'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidadima'waa
     adima'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindadima'wig
     adima'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidadima'win
     adima'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidadima'
     adima'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadima'waan
     adima'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adima'waad
     adima'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edima'waad
     adima'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adima'
     adima'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: adima'wi
     adis+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indadiswaa
     adis+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadiswaan
     adis+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adiswaad
     adis+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ediswaad
     adis+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adis
     adiswi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadiswaa
     adiswi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadiswaan
     adiswi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adiswaad
     adiswi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ediswaad
     adiswi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adiswi
     agaasadezhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaasadezhwaa
     agaasadezhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaasadezhwaan
     agaasadezhwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaasadezhwaad
     agaasadezhwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaasadezhwaad
     agaasadezhwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaasadezhwi
     agaasizhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaasizhwaa
     agaasizhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaasizhwaan
     agaasizhwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaasizhwaad
     agaasizhwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaasizhwaad
     agaasizhwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaasizhwi
     agaasiigizhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaasiigizhwaa
     agaasiigizhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaasiigizhwaan
     agaasiigizhwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaasiigizhwaad
     agaasiigizhwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaasiigizhwaad
     agaasiigizhwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaasiigizhwi
     agokiwas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagokiwaswaa
     agokiwas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagokiwaswaa
     agokiwas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagokiwaswaa
     agokiwas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagokiwaswaan
     agokiwas+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agokiwaswaad
     agokiwas+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egokiwaswaad
     agokiwas+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agokiwas 
     agwa'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwa'waa
     agwa'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwa'waan
     agwa'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwa'waad
     agwa'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwa'waad
     agwa'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwa'
     agwa'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwa'waa
     agwa'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwa'waan
     agwa'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwa'waad
     agwa'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwa'waad
     agwa'wi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwa'wi
     agwana'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagwana'waa
     agwana'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwana'waan
     agwana'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwana'waad
     agwana'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwana'waad
     agwana'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwana'
     agwana'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwana'wi
     agwaabikiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaabikizwaa
     agwaabikiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaabikizwaa
     agwaabikiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwaabikizwaa
     agwaabikiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaabikizwaan
     agwaabikiz+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaabikizwaad
     agwaabikiz+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaabikizwaad
     agwaabikiz+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaabikiz 
     agwaabiiga'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaabiiga'waa
     agwaabiiga'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaabiiga'waa
     agwaabiiga'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwaabiiga'waa
     agwaabiiga'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaabiiga'waan
     agwaabiiga'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaabiiga'waad
     agwaabiiga'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaabiiga'waad
     agwaabiiga'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaabiiga'
     agwaabiiga'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaabiiga'waa
     agwaabiiga'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaabiiga'waan
     agwaabiiga'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaabiiga'waad
     agwaabiiga'wi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaabiiga'waad
     agwaabiiga'wi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaabiiga'wi
     agwaabii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaabii'waa
     agwaabii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaabii'waan
     agwaabii'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaabii'waad
     agwaabii'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaabii'waad
     agwaabii'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaabii'
     agwaabii'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaabii'wi
     agwaa'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaa'waa
     agwaa'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaa'waan
     agwaa'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaa'waad
     agwaa'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaa'waad
     agwaa'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaa'
     agwaa'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaa'waa
     agwaa'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaa'waan
     agwaa'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaa'waad
     agwaa'wi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaa'waad
     agwaa'wi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaa'wi
     agwaaweba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaaweba'waa
     agwaaweba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaaweba'waan
     agwaaweba'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaaweba'waad
     agwaaweba'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaaweba'waad
     agwaaweba'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaaweba'
     agwaaweba'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaaweba'waa
     agwaaweba'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaaweba'waan
     agwaaweba'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaaweba'waad
     agwaaweba'wi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaaweba'waad
     agwaaweba'wi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaaweba'wi
     akwaabiigizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indakwaabiigizhwaa
     akwaabiigizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwaabiigizhwaan
     akwaabiigizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwaabiigizhwaad
     akwaabiigizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwaabiigizhwaad
     akwaabiigizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwaabiigizh
     akwaabiigizhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindakwaabiigizhwaa
     akwaabiigizhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwaabiigizhwaan
     akwaabiigizhwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwaabiigizhwaad
     akwaabiigizhwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwaabiigizhwaad
     akwaabiigizhwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwaabiigizhwi
     akwegizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindakwegizhwaa
     akwegizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwegizhwaan
     akwegizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwegizhwaad
     akwegizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwegizhwaad
     akwegizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwegizh
     akwegizhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindakwegizhwaa
     akwegizhwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwegizhwaan
     akwegizhwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwegizhwaad
     akwegizhwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwegizhwaad
     akwegizhwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwegizhwi
     amo+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indamwaa
     amo+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindamwaa
     amo+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidamwaa
     amo+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odamwaan
     amo+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: amwaad
     amo+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: emwaad
     amo+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: amo
     amo+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: amwi
     amwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indamwaa
     amwi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odamwaan
     amwi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: amwaad
     amwi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: emwaad
     amwi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: amwi
     andone'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandone'waa
     andone'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandone'waan
     andone'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andone'waad
     andone'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endone'waad
     andone'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andone'
     andone'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andone'wi
     andone'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandone'waa
     andone'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandone'waan
     andone'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andone'waad
     andone'wi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endone'waad
     andone'wi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andone'wi
     andoojii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandoojii'waa
     andoojii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandoojii'waan
     andoojii'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andoojii'waad
     andoojii'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andoojii'
     andoojii'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andoojii'wi
     andoojii'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandoojii'waa
     andoojii'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandoojii'waan
     andoojii'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andoojii'waad
     andoojii'wi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endoojii'waad
     andoojii'wi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andoojii'wi
     andwaawanga'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandwaawanga'waa
     andwaawanga'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandwaawanga'waan
     andwaawanga'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andwaawanga'waad
     andwaawanga'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endwaawanga'waad
     andwaawanga'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andwaawanga'wi
     andwaawanga'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andwaawanga'
     angwaakiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indangwaakzwaa
     angwaakiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odangwaakizwaan
     angwaakiz+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: angwaakiziwaad
     angwaakiz+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: engwaakizwaad
     angwaakiz+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: angwaakiz
     apiichizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapiichizhwaa
     apiichizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapiichizhwaan
     apiichizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apiichizhwaad
     apiichizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epiichizhwaad
     apiichizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apiichizh
     apiichizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apiichizhwi
     apiitadezh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapiitadezhwaa
     apiitadezh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapiitadezhwaan
     apiitadezh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apiitadezhwaad
     apiitadezh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epiitadezhwaad
     apiitadezh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apiitadezhwi
     ashkipo+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indashkipwaa
     ashkipo+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashkipwaan
     ashkipo+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashkipwaad
     ashkipo+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshkipwaad
     atis+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indatiswaa
     atis+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindatiswaa
